Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 332.1. A. The Pardon and Parole Board created by
Article VI, Section 10, of the Oklahoma Constitution is authorized
to employ professional investigators and such clerical and
administrative personnel as may be required to carry out the duties
and responsibilities under the provisions of this act.
B. The Pardon and Parole Board shall be authorized to employ
alternate members to serve on the Board.
HB1968 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

C. The Chair of the Pardon and Parole Board may assign
alternate members to serve in the absence of a regular member and
such alternate members shall have all the powers and authority of a
regular Pardon and Parole Board member when so assigned.
D. Alternate members of the Board shall be appointed as
follows:
1. One alternate member of the Board shall be appointed by the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and shall have a minimum of not
less than five (5) years of experience as a former prosecutor;
2. One alternate member of the Board shall be appointed by the
Presiding Judge of the Criminal Court of Appeals and shall have a
minimum of:
a. not less than five (5) years of experience as a former
public defender, or
b. not less than ten (10) years of experience handling
felony criminal cases as a defense attorney;
3. One alternate member of the Board shall be appointed by the
Governor and shall be a former judge of the Oklahoma Court of
Criminal Appeals or a former judge of a district court who presided
over a criminal court docket;
4. One alternate member of the Board shall be appointed by the
Governor and shall be a licensed mental health professional with
expertise in offender rehabilitation; and

HB1968 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. One alternate member of the Board shall be appointed by the
Governor and shall have a minimum of not less than five (5) years of
experience as a parole officer or corrections officer.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.1A, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 332.1A. A. Each member and each alternate member of
the Pardon and Parole Board shall receive at least twelve (12) hours
of training for the first year and six (6) hours of training per
year thereafter on matters relating to the duties of the Board. The
training shall be provided by personnel of the Pardon and Parole
Board.
B. Each member and each alternate member of the Pardon and
Parole Board shall complete annual training based on guidance from
organizations that provide training and technical assistance related
to the probation and parole process. Annual training curriculum
shall include, but not be limited to, identifying, understanding and
targeting criminogenic needs, the principles of effective
intervention, core correctional practices and how to support and
encourage offender behavior change.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 332.4. A. Upon the effective date of this act, members
of the Pardon and Parole Board shall be deemed regular full-time,
salaried employees of the Pardon and Parole Board.
HB1968 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. The Chair of the Pardon and Parole Board shall be selected
by the Board. The Chair of the Pardon and Parole Board shall
receive Twenty-four Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($24,800.00) per
annum, payable monthly, in the following allotment:
1. Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) for preparation for said
meeting; and
2. One Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-seven Dollars ($1,667.00) for
the regular monthly Board meeting.
B. C. 1. The members of the Board shall receive Twenty-two
Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($22,800.00) a salary of Eighty-five
Thousand Dollars ($85,000.00) per annum, payable monthly in the
following allotment:
1. Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) for preparation for said
meeting; and
2. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for the
regular monthly Board meeting.
2. The alternate members of the Board shall receive a salary of
Forty-two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($42,500.00) per annum,
payable monthly.
C. D. 1. Failure of any member to attend one two Board meeting
meetings in any calendar year, except for justifiable excuse as
determined by the Chair pursuant to written policy established by
the Board, shall preclude the right of the member to receive his or

HB1968 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

her monthly compensation established by subsection A or B of this
section.
2. In addition, any member who fails to attend two three or
more Board meetings in any calendar year except for extraordinary
circumstances as determined by the Chair pursuant to written policy
established by the Board shall be deemed to have committed official
misconduct as such term is defined by Section 93 of Title 51 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. To initiate a removal from office pursuant to
this paragraph, the Board shall pass a resolution by a majority of
the members of the Board detailing the alleged misconduct. Such
removal shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 51
of the Oklahoma Statutes.
3. Failure to attend meetings of the Board, pursuant to the
policy established by the Board, shall constitute cause for removal
pursuant to Section 10 of Article VI of the Oklahoma Constitution.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.15, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 332.15. A. From and after the effective date of this
act, no member or alternate member of the Pardon and Parole Board
and/or or their law firm or law partners or associate may represent
in a legal capacity any inmate incarcerated in any state penal
institution. If a member or alternate member of the Pardon and
Parole Board, or his or her law partners or associate or any member
of his or her law firm undertakes the representation of an inmate in
HB1968 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

viol ation of this prohibition, the member or alternate member of the
Board shall forfeit his or her office. In any case in which an
inmate requesting a pardon or parole was represented in a legal
capacity by any member or alternate member of the Pardon and Parole
Board and/or or their law firm or law partners or associate prior to
imposition of a prison term, the Board member or alternate Board
member who represented such inmate shall be disqualified from voting
on such inmate's the request of the inmate for a pardon or parole.
B. A member or alternate member of the Pardon and Parole Board
shall uphold and promote the independence, impartiality, fairness,
and integrity of the Board, and should avoid impropriety or the
appearance of impropriety.
C. If any Pardon and Parole Board member or alternate member
determines circumstances would cause a reasonable person with
knowledge of all the relevant facts to question his or her
impartiality in a specific matter, or creates the appearance of
impropriety, the Pardon and Parole Board member shall disclose any
potential conflict of interest and shall withdraw from participation
in the matter.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.


HB1968 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.